Washington statutes.
RCW 1.04.013

1950 Supplement enacted.

The titles, chapters, and sections designated as the "1950 Supplement to the Revised Code of Washington" attested by the secretary of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives of the legislature of the state of Washington, and filed with the secretary of state, are hereby enacted and consolidated into and with the Revised Code of Washington. Said 1950 supplement is intended to embrace (1) in a revised and codified form, all those laws of the state of Washington of a general and permanent nature enacted since January 1, 1949, (2) revision and recodification of certain of the titles, chapters, and sections of the revised code, and (3) application of a new system of numbering to all of the sections and certain of the chapters of the revised code, subject to RCW 1.04.014.

[ 1951 c 5 s 1.]